Hawaii, session 2026, SB2910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Simplifying Permitting for Enhanced Economic Development (SPEED) task force was established pursuant to Act 133, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025.  The SPEED task force brought together various state and county agencies and stakeholders to address issues related to obtaining permits for housing, infrastructure, and other projects.  The legislature further finds that the SPEED task force is responsible for identifying actions taken, challenges encountered, and legislative measures needed to facilitate, expedite, and coordinate state and intergovernmental permitting processes. In its initial phase, the SPEED task force split into three permitted interaction groups, each focused on a specific, high-impact segment of the permitting system.  The SPEED task force then submitted to the legislature a December 2025 final report of the permitted interaction groups, representing a combined report of the three permitted interaction groups, which outlined findings regarding existing actions and persistent challenges and presented initial recommendations for legislative and administrative measures to improve permitting processes statewide. The December 2025 final report recommends additional training and professional development for state and county permitting agency employees as part of a key policy change to improve the permitting process.  The final report also finds that further training opportunities focused on new building codes, digital tools, and emerging technologies could help reduce interpretation errors and improve overall permit issuance times. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the state building code council to provide annual training to state and county permitting agency employees. SECTION 2.  Chapter 107, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§107-     Annual training; building codes; state and county permitting agency employees.  (a)  In addition to the duties under section 107-24, the council shall provide annual training to state and county permitting agency employees, including but not limited to plan reviewers, inspectors, and policy staff.  The training shall provide: (1)  Guidance on changes made to building codes and standards; (2)  A practical application component, providing employees examples of how code changes impact common projects; (3)  An overview of how to use any digital tools, including artificial intelligence tools, that may be available to assist with permit intake and review; and (4)  Best practices for providing clear, consistent comments and feedback to applicants for permit applications. (b)  The training shall include recorded modules provided to all applicable state and county permitting agency employees." SECTION 3.  Section 107-24, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows: "(g)  The council may, in addition to the annual training required pursuant to section 107-   , provide education and technical training and administrative assistance in the form of services or grants at the state and county levels relating to the implementation and enforcement of the Hawaii state building codes adopted pursuant to this part." SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $25,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the state building code council to provide annual training to state and county permitting agency employees; provided that no funds shall be made available under this Act unless each county provides matching funds in the sum of $6,250 per county. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state building code council for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________